Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-416
Fresh pursuit; peace officer from another state; authority to make arrest.

Any member of a duly organized state, county or municipal peace unit of another state of the United States who enters this state in fresh pursuit, and continues within this state in such fresh pursuit, of a person, in order to arrest him on the ground that he is believed to have committed a felony in such other state, shall have the same authority to arrest and hold such person in custody as has any member of any duly organized state, county or municipal peace unit of this state, to arrest and hold in custody a person on the ground that he is believed to have committed a felony in this state.

Laws 1937, c. 70, § 1, p. 256;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 29-416;

R.S.1943, § 29-416.

The Nebraska Uniform Act on Fresh Pursuit applies only to officers from another state entering this state; it does not apply to a police officer of a city of the second class seeking to arrest a misdemeanor suspect outside the officer's geographical jurisdiction. State v. Tingle, 239 Neb. 558, 477 N.W.2d 544 (1991).

Fresh pursuit is pursuit instituted immediately and with intent to reclaim or recapture. State v. Goff, 174 Neb. 548, 118 N.W.2d 625 (1962).